Washington statutes.
RCW 43.362.050

Interlocal agreement for transfers of development rights—Rules.

(1) To facilitate participation, the department shall develop and adopt by rule terms and conditions of an interlocal agreement for transfers of development rights between counties, cities, and towns. Counties, cities, and towns participating in the regional program have the option of adopting the rule by reference to transfer development rights across jurisdictional boundaries as an alternative to entering into an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW.

(2) This section and the rules adopted under this section shall be deemed to provide an alternative method for the implementation of a regional transfer of development rights program, and shall not be construed as imposing any additional condition upon the exercise of any other powers vested in municipalities.

(3) Nothing in this section prohibits a county, city, or town from entering into an interlocal agreement under chapter 39.34 RCW to transfer development rights under the regional program.

[ 2009 c 474 s 5.]